District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.19

Judicial review.

Any person or class of persons aggrieved by a decision of the Rental Housing Commission, or by any failure on the part of the Rental Housing Commission or Rent Administrator to act within any time certain mandated by this chapter, may seek judicial review of the decision or an order compelling the decision by filing a petition for review in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 219, 32 DCR 3089
This section is referenced in § 42-3501.03.
1981 Ed., § 45-2529.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3502.01.